Maryland, session 2025, HB1525.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
4–401.
(a) Subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, the legislative body of a
municipality may enlarge its boundaries by annexation as provided in this subtitle.
(b) The power of annexation applies only to land that:
(1) is contiguous and adjoining to the existing boundaries of the
municipality; and
(2) does not create an unincorporated area that is bounded on all sides by:
(i) real property presently in the boundaries of the municipality;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1525*

HOUSE BILL 1525
(ii) real property proposed to be in the boundaries of the municipality
as a result of the proposed annexation; or
(iii) any combination of real property described in item (i) or (ii) of
this item.
(c) A municipality may not annex land that is:
(1) in another municipality; OR
(2) LOCATED IN A DIFFERENT LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT THAN A
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT IN WHICH THE MUNICIPALITY OR ANY PART OF THE
MUNICIPALITY IS LOCATED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.